Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6571YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2214 Section 1. Section 455A.14, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. Notwithstanding Except as provided in paragraph 3 âbâ , notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 4 the department is authorized to establish fees for camping 5 and use of rental facilities and other special privileges at 6 state parks and recreation areas under the jurisdiction of the 7 department. 8 b. The department shall not require a veteran of the armed 9 forces of the United States to pay a fee for camping or the use 10 of rental facilities at state parks and recreation areas under 11 the jurisdiction of the department. The department may request 12 documentation of a veteranâs status for purposes of waiving any 13 fees under this paragraph. 14